Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2084.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5561YH (1) 91 ak/ko H.F. 2084 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 135.39F Autologous or directed 1 blood donations. 2 1. For the purposes of this section: 3 a. âAutologous blood donationâ means a blood donation made 4 by an individual for the individualâs own use. 5 b. âBlood bankâ means the same as defined in section 141A.1. 6 c. âDirected blood donationâ means a donation of blood 7 or blood components for the purpose of transfusion into a 8 specified individual. 9 2. A blood bank that facilitates autologous blood donations 10 or directed blood donations shall comply with an individualâs 11 request, based on a physicianâs order for a medical procedure 12 that may require a blood transfusion, for an autologous blood 13 donation or directed blood donation. 14 3. An autologous blood donation or directed blood donation 15 collected pursuant to this section shall be subject to all 16 applicable federal and state laws and rules. 17 4. A blood bank may charge a reasonable fee for facilitating 18 an autologous blood donation or directed blood donation under 19 this section. 20 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 135B.36 Autologous or directed blood 21 donations. 22 1. For the purposes of this section: 23 a. âAutologous blood donationâ means the same as defined in 24 section 135.39F. 25 b. âDirected blood donationâ means the same as defined in 26 section 135.39F. 27 2. If a hospital licensed under this chapter facilitates 28 blood donations, the hospital shall comply with an individualâs 29 request, based on a physicianâs order for a medical procedure 30 that may require a blood transfusion, for an autologous blood 31 donation or directed blood donation. 32 3. An autologous blood donation or directed blood donation 33 collected pursuant to this section shall be subject to all 34 applicable federal and state laws and rules. 35 -1- LSB 5561YH (1) 91 ak/ko 1/ 2 H.F. 2084 4. A hospital may charge a reasonable fee for facilitating 1 an autologous blood donation or directed blood donation under 2 this section. 3